Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 8. Geologist, Geological Survey and Topographic Mapping

Cross references. —

As to mines and minerals generally, see title 30.

§ 9-2-801.
Definitions.

As used in W.S.

9-2-801

through

9-2-810

:

“Geology” means as defined by W.S. 33-41-102(a)(vi);

“Geologist” means as defined by W.S. 33-41-102(a)(iv).

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 170, § 2.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 151, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-248.1; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1401; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 203, § 2; 1997, ch. 170, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 48, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-2-802.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 170, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 151, § 1, related to preparation and approval of reports containing geological information.

§ 9-2-803.
State geologist; appointment; term; removal; pecuniary interest in mineral property in state prohibited; duties; powers.

The state geologist shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate. He shall hold his office for six (6) years or until his successor is appointed and qualified. No person shall be appointed to this position unless he is a professional geologist as defined by W.S. 9-2-801(a)(ii) with the theoretical knowledge and the practical experience and skill for the position. The governor may remove the state geologist as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

Neither the state geologist nor the geological program manager shall hold a pecuniary interest in a producing or prospective mineral property of any kind, including oil and gas, in this state.

The state geologist shall:

Examine and report on any state or school lands when requested by the board of land commissioners and make written reports concerning the geology of any lands in which Wyoming is interested and on other matters about which the respective state boards desire information;

Perform all other acts provided by the laws of Wyoming relating to mineral deposits;

Make valuation surveys, investigations, appraisements and reports on the mineral resources of the state;

Keep in his office full and complete records of all work done by him or under his supervision, all of which shall be the property of the state;

Publish all reports, maps and data he considers advisable and of public interest, and distribute the reports, maps and data to the public upon request either free or at a reasonable price;

Regarding roadside bedrock geological formations shall:

Receive, investigate and attempt to resolve any complaints under W.S. 24-1-118(b)(iii);

Report grievances under W.S. 24-1-118(b)(iii) to the joint minerals, business and economic development interim committee;

Consult with the department of transportation as provided in W.S. 24-1-118(b)(iv) on the appropriateness of any signage identifying roadside bedrock geological formations.

The state geologist may:

Designate and supervise mining operations on state and school lands in the interest of economic development;

Cooperate with the United States government, departments of the state of Wyoming, University of Wyoming or private corporations in geological, topographic, soil and mineral surveys, and in industrial investigations and examinations that may bring about further economic development of the mineral resources of the state. The cooperative activities of his office may be accomplished on whatever basis he determines but in no case shall the cost to the state exceed fifty percent (50%) of the cost of the activity.

History.

Laws 1901, ch. 45, §§ 1, 4, 9; C.S. 1910, §§ 208, 211, 216; Laws 1919, ch. 72, § 1; C.S. 1920, §§ 221, 224, 226; Laws 1927, ch. 90, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 109-1001, 109-1004, 109-1007; Laws 1933, ch. 33, § 1; C.S. 1945, §§ 18-1201, 18-1204, 18-1205; Laws 1947, ch. 129, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-249, 9-252, 9-253; Laws 1973, ch. 215, § 1; 1977, ch. 151, § 2; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-3-1403, 9-3-1406, 9-3-1407; Laws 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1991, ch. 122, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 2; 2019 ch. 64, § 1, effective November 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 186, § 3, effective November 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to board of land commissioners, see art. 18, § 3, Wyo. Const. and §

36-2-101

.

For provisions as to protections of prehistoric ruins, pictographs, hieroglyphics or any other ancient markings or writings or archaeological and paleontological deposits, see §

36-1-114

.

For duty of state geologist to visit and report upon lands held under coal and mineral leases, see §

36-6-105

.

The 2019 amendment,

effective November 1, 2019, in (c)(iv), substituted “of the state;” for “of the state; and” and added (c)(vi).

Repealing clauses. —

Section 10, ch. 45, Laws 1901, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict with that act.

Section 3, ch. 72, Laws 1919, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict with that act.

Section 3, ch. 90, Laws 1927, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict with that act.

§ 9-2-804.
Geological survey; created; location of office and headquarters.

A geological survey of Wyoming is created. The office and headquarters of the geological survey shall be in Laramie, Albany County, Wyoming, and may be located at the University of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 189, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-264.1; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1420; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 9-2-805.
Geological survey; duties; disposition of materials and specimens collected.

The geological survey shall:

Study the geological formations and rocks of the state with special reference to its metallic and nonmetallic resources;

Examine the topography and physical features of the state focusing on the way people use the land;

Seek a comprehensive understanding of the geology of and fossils in the state;

Prepare and publish:

Reports and maps of the geology and mineral resources of the state;

Reports and maps of the topography and physical features of the state;

Special reports, with necessary illustrations and maps, of the geology of and fossils in the state;

Comprehensive summaries or digests, together with bibliographies and maps, of all literature and reports heretofore published on the geology and mineral resources of Wyoming.

Distribute to the public on request publications and maps either free or at prices determined by the geological survey;

Furnish advice and consulting services to state departments, agencies and officers;

Contract with Wyoming state agencies, industry, federal and state geological surveys for services involving any of the foregoing purposes or areas.

The geological survey shall deposit in the geological museum of the University of Wyoming all materials and specimens after the purposes of the geological survey have been served. Duplicates may be distributed to scientific and industrial institutions under regulations adopted by the state geologist and the geological survey board.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 189, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 9-264.2; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1421; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

For provision recognizing the desirability of collecting, analyzing and organizing studies, information and data concerning mineral deposits, geological formations and mining and milling operations in the state, see §

30-2-302

.

§ 9-2-806.
Geological survey; state geologist as chief administrative officer; duties; appointment of employees.

The state geologist is the chief administrative officer of the geological survey. With the advice of the geological survey board, the state geologist shall:

Supervise the functions of the geological survey;

Establish policy for the geological survey.

With the consent of the board and within the appropriation allowed by law, the state geologist may appoint employees necessary to assist him and the board.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 189, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 9-264.3; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1422; Laws 1979, ch. 44, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to state geologist, see §

9-2-803

.

§ 9-2-807.
Geological survey board; created; membership; term; qualifications; removal; vacancies; election of officers; meetings; quorum; compensation; expenses; duties.

The geological survey board is created. The board consists of eight (8) members, including the governor, the president of the University of Wyoming or his designee, the state oil and gas supervisor and five (5) members appointed for four (4) year terms by the governor with the consent of the senate. The five (5) members shall be qualified electors of the state who possess the knowledge, experience and skill to qualify them for the position. The governor may remove any appointed member as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. Vacancies shall be filled by the governor for the unexpired term. The state geologist is an ex officio member of the board.

At each March meeting, the board shall elect from its members a president, a vice-president and a secretary.

The board shall hold meetings in March, June, September and December. Special meetings may be called by the president or by a majority of the members of the board. A majority of the members of the board constitutes a quorum.

The five (5) public members of the board shall receive no compensation but shall be reimbursed under W.S.

9-3-102

and

9-3-103

for per diem and travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

The board shall:

Assist the state geologist in formulating and directing policies and programs of the geological survey;

Adopt reasonable rules and regulations for the administration of W.S.

9-2-804

through

9-2-810

.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 189, §§ 4 to 7; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-264.4 to 9-264.7; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-3-1423 to 9-3-1426; Laws 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 2; 2001, ch. 33, § 1; 2016 ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

Cross references. —

As to meetings of governmental agencies generally, see §§

16-4-401

to

16-4-407

.

As to state oil and gas supervisor, see §

30-5-108

.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, deleted “but not more than three (3) of whom shall be from the same political party” at the end of the first sentence of (a).

§ 9-2-808.
Geological survey; authority to cooperate and exchange information; cost.

The geological survey may cooperate and exchange information with and contract with the United States geological survey, state geological surveys, departments of the state of Wyoming, the University of Wyoming, private industry, scientific institutions and foundations for projects or undertakings which will further the purposes of the geological survey. The cost to the state of Wyoming shall in no case exceed the amount approved therefor by the board.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 189, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 9-264.8; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1427; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to creation and duties of geological survey board, see §

9-2-807

.

§ 9-2-809.
Geological survey; use of University of Wyoming students for field expeditions; expenses.

The geological survey may organize field expeditions to perform work for the geological survey using University of Wyoming students who are sufficiently advanced in their study of geology to be able to perform the work. Field expedition expenses shall be paid from a general fund appropriation upon authorization by the board.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 189, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 9-264.9; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1428; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to creation and duties of geological survey board, see §

9-2-807

.

§ 9-2-810.
Legislative declaration of cooperation with United States geological survey.

It is the policy of the state of Wyoming to cooperate in the topographic mapping of the state of Wyoming with the topographic division of the United States geological survey in a program to secure accurate topographic maps of the state and to speed up this mapping.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 163, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-265; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1440; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.